apertium-oc-es/apertium-oc-es.oc.metadix
    <pardef n="leng/ua__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ües</l> 
        <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ues</l> 
        <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uas</l> 
        <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ua</l> 
        <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aig/ua__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ües</l> 
        <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uas</l> 
        <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ua</l> 
        <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="part__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="va/ca__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ques</l> 
        <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cas</l> 
        <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ca</l> 
        <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="monar/ca__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ques</l> 
        <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cas</l> 
        <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ca</l> 
        <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aubèr/ja__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ges</l> 
        <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jas</l> 
        <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ja</l> 
        <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="parapluè/ja__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ges</l> 
        <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jas</l> 
        <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ja</l> 
        <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="seden/ça__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ces</l> 
        <r>ça<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ças</l> 
        <r>ça<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ça</l> 
        <r>ça<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="participaire__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="di/a__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="conselhèr__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="presoniè/r__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>res</l> 
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iras</l> 
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ras</l> 
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ra</l> 
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ira</l> 
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rs</l> 
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>r</l> 
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lo/p__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>bes</l> 
        <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>bas</l> 
        <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ba</l> 
        <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ps</l> 
        <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>p</l> 
        <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="afilia/t__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>des</l> 
        <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>das</l> 
        <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>da</l> 
        <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ts</l> 
        <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>t</l> 
        <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="frai/r__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rs</l> 
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>r</l> 
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ami/c__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gues</l> 
        <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gas</l> 
        <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ga</l> 
        <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cs</l> 
        <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>c</l> 
        <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sindi/c__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ques</l> 
        <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cas</l> 
        <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ca</l> 
        <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cs</l> 
        <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>c</l> 
        <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="aigua">
        <i>aig</i> 
        <par n="aig/ua__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="amant">
        <i>amant</i> 
        <par n="participaire__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="amic">
        <i>ami</i> 
        <par n="ami/c__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="assegurança">
        <i>asseguran</i> 
        <par n="seden/ça__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="branca">
        <i>bran</i> 
        <par n="va/ca__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="cavalièr" a="carmentano">
        <i>cavaliè</i> 
        <par n="presoniè/r__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="chilenc" a="carmentano">
        <i>chilen</i> 
        <par n="sindi/c__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="combinacion">
        <i>combinacion</i> 
        <par n="part__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="conilh">
        <i>conilh</i> 
        <par n="conselhèr__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="credença">
        <i>creden</i> 
        <par n="seden/ça__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="deputat">
        <i>deputa</i> 
        <par n="afilia/t__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dignitat">
        <i>dignitat</i> 
        <par n="part__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dinamica">
        <i>dinami</i> 
        <par n="va/ca__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="donant">
        <i>donant</i> 
        <par n="participaire__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="drama" a="carmentano">
        <i>dram</i> 
        <par n="di/a__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="enemic">
        <i>enemi</i> 
        <par n="ami/c__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="enveja">
        <i>enve</i> 
        <par n="aubèr/ja__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="expresident" a="carmentano">
        <i>expresident</i> 
        <par n="conselhèr__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="farmaceutic" a="mmonge">
        <i>farmaceuti</i> 
        <par n="sindi/c__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ferit">
        <i>feri</i> 
        <par n="afilia/t__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ferrièr">
        <i>ferriè</i> 
        <par n="presoniè/r__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="frair">
        <i>frai</i> 
        <par n="frai/r__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="granja" a="carmentano">
        <i>gran</i> 
        <par n="aubèr/ja__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="hantauma" a="carmentano">
        <i>hantaum</i> 
        <par n="di/a__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="lengua">
        <i>leng</i> 
        <par n="leng/ua__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="lop">
        <i>lo</i> 
        <par n="lo/p__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="lòtja">
        <i>lòt</i> 
        <par n="aubèr/ja__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="marca">
        <i>mar</i> 
        <par n="va/ca__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="mare">
        <i>mare</i> 
        <par n="part__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="marinièr">
        <i>mariniè</i> 
        <par n="presoniè/r__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="membre">
        <i>membre</i> 
        <par n="participaire__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mesfisança" a="carmentano">
        <i>mesfisan</i> 
        <par n="seden/ça__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="messatgèr">
        <i>messatgèr</i> 
        <par n="conselhèr__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="monarca">
        <i>monar</i> 
        <par n="monar/ca__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="music" a="carmentano">
        <i>musi</i> 
        <par n="sindi/c__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="paradigma" a="carmentano">
        <i>paradigm</i> 
        <par n="di/a__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="parapluèja">
        <i>parapluè</i> 
        <par n="parapluè/ja__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="placa">
        <i>pla</i> 
        <par n="va/ca__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="plaja">
        <i>pla</i> 
        <par n="aubèr/ja__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="portièr" a="carmentano">
        <i>portiè</i> 
        <par n="presoniè/r__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="recaudador">
        <i>recaudador</i> 
        <par n="conselhèr__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sergent">
        <i>sergent</i> 
        <par n="participaire__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="servitud">
        <i>servitud</i> 
        <par n="part__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="soldat">
        <i>solda</i> 
        <par n="afilia/t__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="suberviuença" a="carmentano">
        <i>suberviuen</i> 
        <par n="seden/ça__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tramvia" a="carmentano">
        <i>tramvi</i> 
        <par n="di/a__n"/> 
    </e>
